Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-821
Schools; violation of contract; notice; suspension of certificate.

Upon presentation of proof that any teacher, principal, supervisor, assistant superintendent, or superintendent has, without just cause, violated or abrogated his or her contract with a school district in the state, the State Board of Education shall suspend the certificate of such teacher, principal, supervisor, assistant superintendent, or superintendent for a period of not more than one calendar year after a hearing has been held at a time and place fixed by the board and of which notice has been given to the person whose certificate is sought to be suspended by either registered or certified mail at least ten days prior to the hearing.

Laws 1943, c. 201, § 4, p. 673;

R.S.1943, § 79-2149;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 352, p. 809;

Laws 1957, c. 242, § 58, p. 865;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1252;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 451.

Proceeding to suspend teacher's certificate becomes moot on appeal when period of suspension has elapsed. Henderson v. School Dist. of Scottsbluff, 184 Neb. 858, 173 N.W.2d 32 (1969).

Authority to revoke certificate is vested in State Board of Education. Greer v. Chelewski, 162 Neb. 450, 76 N.W.2d 438 (1956).